Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-907
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Medical Assistance Act:

(1) Committee means the Health and Human Services Committee
of the Legislature;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Medicaid Reform Plan means the Medicaid Reform Plan submitted
on December 1, 2005, pursuant to the Medicaid Reform Act enacted pursuant
to Laws 2005, LB 709;

(4) Medicaid state plan means the comprehensive written document,
developed and amended by the department and approved by the federal Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services, which describes the nature and scope of
the medical assistance program and provides assurances that the department
will administer the program in compliance with federal requirements;

(5) Provider means a person providing health care or related
services under the medical assistance program;

(6) School-based
health center means a health center that:

(a) Is located in or is adjacent to a school
facility;

(b) Is organized through school, school district, learning community,
community, and provider relationships;

(c) Is administered by a sponsoring facility;

(d) Provides
school-based health services onsite during school hours to children and adolescents
by health care professionals in accordance with state and local laws, rules,
and regulations, established standards, and community practice;

(e) Does not perform
abortion services or refer or counsel for abortion services and does not dispense,
prescribe, or counsel for contraceptive drugs or devices; and

(f) Does not
serve as a child's or an adolescent's medical or dental home but augments
and supports services provided by the medical or dental home;

(7) School-based
health services may include any combination of the following as determined
in partnership with a sponsoring facility, the school district, and the community:

(a) Medical
health;

(b) Behavioral and mental health;

(c) Preventive health; and

(d) Oral health;

(8) Sponsoring
facility means:

(a) A hospital;

(b) A public health department as defined in section 71-1626;

(c) A federally
qualified health center as defined in section 1905(l)(2)(B) of the federal
Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396d(l)(2)(B), as such act and section existed
on January 1, 2010;

(d) A nonprofit health care entity whose mission is to provide access
to comprehensive primary health care services;

(e) A school or school
district; or

(f) A program administered by the Indian Health Service or the federal
Bureau of Indian Affairs or operated by an Indian tribe or tribal organization
under the federal Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act,
or an urban Indian program under Title V of the federal Indian Health Care
Improvement Act, as such acts existed on January 1, 2010; and

(9) Waiver means the waiver
of applicability to the state of one or more provisions of federal law relating
to the medical assistance program based on an application by the department
and approval of such application by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 246;

Laws 2010, LB1106, § 2.